Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Chapter 55. Sentencing and Probation.
Sec. 12.55.088.
Modification of sentence.

The court may modify or reduce a sentence by entering a written order under a motion made within 180 days of the original sentencing.

The sentencing court may not be required to entertain a second or successive motion for similar relief brought under (a) of this section on behalf of the same prisoner.

A sentence may not be reduced or modified so as to result in a term of imprisonment that is less than the minimum sentence or lower than the presumptive range required by law for the original sentence.

A victim has the right to comment in writing to the court on a motion to modify or reduce a sentence filed by the person who perpetrated the offense against the victim, and has the right to give sworn testimony or make an unsworn oral presentation at a hearing held in connection with the motion. If there are numerous victims, the court may limit the number of victims who may give sworn testimony or make an unsworn oral presentation during the hearing.

If a motion is filed to modify or reduce a sentence by a defendant who perpetrated a crime against a person or arson in the first degree, the court shall, if feasible, send a copy of the motion to the Department of Corrections sufficiently in advance of any scheduled hearing or briefing deadline to enable the department to notify the victim of that crime. If that victim has earlier requested to be notified, the Department of Corrections shall send the victim a copy of the motion and inform the person of that person’s rights under this section, the deadline for receipt of written comments, the hearing date, and the court’s address.

The court shall provide copies of the victim’s written comments to the prosecuting attorney, the person filing the motion to reduce or modify a sentence, and that person’s attorney.

In deciding whether to modify or reduce a sentence, the court shall consider the victim’s comments, testimony, or unsworn oral presentation, when relevant, and any response by the prosecuting attorney and the person filing the motion.

If a victim desires notice under this section, the victim shall maintain a current, valid mailing address on file with the commissioner of corrections. The commissioner shall send the notice to the victim’s last known address. The victim’s address may not be disclosed to the offender or to the offender’s attorney.

History.

(§ 12 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 27 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 59 SLA 1989; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 6 ch 79 SLA 1995; am § 6 ch 2 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

Definition of “victim” — AS

12.55.185

Designation of Representative — AS

12.55.180

Criminal Rule 35

Cross references. —

For court rule on modification, see Rule 35(b), Alaska Rule of Criminal Procedure. For procedures when more than one person desires notice under this section, see
AS

12.55.180

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective March 23, 2005, made stylistic changes in subsection (c).

Sec. 12.55.090.
Granting of probation.

Probation may be granted whether the offense under AS 11 or AS 16 or the crime is punishable by fine or imprisonment or both. If an offense under AS 11 or AS 16 or a crime is punishable by both fine and imprisonment, the court may impose a fine and place the defendant on probation as to imprisonment. Probation may be limited to one or more counts or indictments, but, in the absence of express limitation, shall extend to the entire sentence and judgment.

Except as otherwise provided in (f) of this section, the court may revoke or modify any condition of probation, change the period of probation, or terminate probation and discharge the defendant from probation.

The period of probation, together with any extension, may not exceed

25 years for a felony sex offense; or

10 years for any other offense.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 68 SLA 1965.]

[Repealed, § 11 ch 68 SLA 1965.]

Unless the defendant and the prosecuting authority agree at the probation revocation proceeding or other proceeding related to a probation violation, the person qualifies for a reduction under AS

33.05.020(h)

, or a probation officer recommends to the court that probation be terminated and the defendant be discharged from probation under (g) of this section or AS

33.05.040

, the court may not reduce the specific period of probation or the specific term of suspended incarceration except by the amount of incarceration imposed for a probation violation, if

the sentence was imposed in accordance with a plea agreement under Rule 11, Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure; and

the agreement required a specific period of probation or a specific term of suspended incarceration.

At the discretion of the probation officer, a probation officer may recommend to the court that probation be terminated and a defendant be discharged from probation if the defendant

has completed at least

two years on probation if the person was convicted of a class A or class B felony that is not a crime under (4) of this subsection; or

18 months on probation if the person was convicted of a crime that is not a crime

under (A) of this paragraph; or

under (4) of this subsection;

has completed all treatment programs required as a condition of probation;

is currently in compliance with all conditions of probation for all of the cases for which the person is on probation; and

has not been convicted of an unclassified felony offense, a sexual felony as defined in AS

12.55.185

, or a crime involving domestic violence as defined in AS

18.66.990

.

Before a court may terminate probation and discharge the defendant before the period of probation for the offense has been completed under (g) of this section, the court shall allow victims to comment in writing to the court or allow a victim to give sworn testimony or make an unsworn oral presentation at a hearing held to determine whether to reduce the period of probation or terminate probation and discharge the defendant.

If a probation officer recommends to the court that probation be terminated and a defendant be discharged from probation under (g) of this section, and if the victim has earlier requested to be notified, the Department of Corrections shall send the victim notice of the recommendation under (g) of this section and inform the victim of the victim’s rights under this section, the deadline for receipt of written comments, the hearing date, and the court’s address.

If the victim submits written comments directly to the court and the parties do not otherwise have the victim statements, the court shall distribute the statements to the parties.

In deciding whether to terminate probation and discharge the defendant from probation under (g) of this section, the court shall consider the victim’s comments, testimony, or unsworn oral presentation, when relevant, and any response by the prosecuting attorney and defendant.

If a victim desires notice under this section, the victim shall maintain a current, valid mailing address on file with the commissioner of corrections. The commissioner shall send the notice to the victim’s last known address. The victim’s address may not be disclosed to the defendant or the defendant’s attorney.

The court shall discharge the defendant from probation upon completion of the period of probation. The period of probation is considered to be completed when the combination of time served and credits earned under AS

33.05.020

is equal to the probation period imposed, or after the probationer has been discharged from probation under this section.

In this section, “sex offense” has the meaning given in AS

12.63.100

.

History.

(§ 8.09 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 25 ch 43 SLA 1964; am § 11 ch 68 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1994; am § 22 ch 24 SLA 2007; am § 22 ch 75 SLA 2008; am §§ 9, 10 ch 70 SLA 2012; am §§
78 — 81 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 14 ch 13 SLA 2017; am § 30 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am §§
68, 69 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(i) and (k), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendments to subsection (c), see sec. 29,
ch. 13, SLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (g), see sec. 75(c),
ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, inserted “Except as otherwise provided in (f) of this section,” in (b), and added (f).

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (c)(1), substituted “15 years” for “25 years”, in (c)(2) substituted “an unclassified felony under AS 11” for “any other offense”; added (c)(3)-(6); the 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (b), deleted “or may” preceding “change the period”; added “, or terminate probation and discharge the defendant from probation” at the end; in (f), inserted “related to a probation violation, the person qualifies for a reduction under AS

33.05.020(h)

, or a probation officer recommends to the court that probation be terminated and the defendant be discharged from probation under (g) of this section or AS

33.05.040

” preceding “the court may not”; added subsections (g) — (n).

The first 2017 amendment, effective June 20, 2017, in (c)(2), inserted “not listed in (1) of this subsection” at the end.

The second 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (g)(1)(B), substituted “18 months on probation” for “one year on probation”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (c), which read, “(c) The period of probation, together with any extension, may not exceed

“(1) 15 years for a felony sex offense;

“(2) 10 years for an unclassified felony under AS 11 not listed in (1) of this subsection;

“(3) five years for a felony offense not listed in (1) or (2) of this subsection;

“(4) three years for a misdemeanor offense

“(A) under AS 11.41;

“(B) that is a crime involving domestic violence; or

“(C) that is a sex offense, as that term is defined in AS

12.63.100

;

“(5) two years for a misdemeanor offense under AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

, if the person has previously been convicted of an offense under AS

28.35.030

or

28.35.032

, or a similar law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction; or

“(6) one year for an offense not listed in (1) — (5) of this subsection.”; in (g), substituted “At the discretion of the probation officer, a probation officer may recommend” for “A probation officer shall recommend” at the beginning of the introductory paragraph, substituted “(4) of this subsection” for “(5) of this subsection” in (g)(1)(A) and (g)(1)(B)(ii), deleted (g)(3), which read, “has not been found in violation of conditions of probation by the court for the period specified in (1) of this subsection;” and redesignated the following paragraphs accordingly.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 17,
ch. 70, SLA 2012 provides that the 2012 amendment to subsection (b) and subsection (f) apply “to offenses occurring on or after July 1, 2012.”

Section 142(d), ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendments to (c) and (g) of this section apply “to probation ordered on or after July 9, 2019, for conduct occurring on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 12.55.100.
Conditions of probation.

While on probation and among the conditions of probation, the defendant

shall be required to obey all state, federal, and local laws or ordinances, and any court orders applicable to the probationer; and

may be required

to pay a fine in one or several sums;

to make restitution or reparation to aggrieved parties for actual damages or loss caused by the crime for which conviction was had, including compensation to a victim that is a nonprofit organization for the value of labor or goods provided by volunteers if the labor or goods were necessary to alleviate or mitigate the effects of the defendant’s crime; when determining the amount of actual damages or loss under this subparagraph, the court shall value property as the market value of the property at the time and place of the crime or, if the market value cannot reasonably be ascertained, the cost of the replacement of the property within a reasonable time after the crime;

to provide for the support of any persons for whose support the defendant is legally responsible;

to perform community work in accordance with AS

12.55.055

;

to participate in or comply with the treatment plan of an inpatient or outpatient rehabilitation program specified by either the court or the defendant’s probation officer that is related to the defendant’s offense or to the defendant’s rehabilitation;

to satisfy the screening, evaluation, referral, and program requirements of an agency authorized by the court to make referrals for rehabilitative treatment or to provide rehabilitative treatment;

to comply with a program established under AS

47.38.020

; and

to comply with the sanctions imposed by the defendant’s probation officer under AS

33.05.020(g)

.

The defendant’s liability for a fine or other punishment imposed as to which probation is granted shall be fully discharged by the fulfillment of the terms and conditions of probation.

A program of inpatient treatment may be required by the authorized agency under (a)(2)(F) of this section only if authorized in the judgment, and may not exceed the maximum term of inpatient treatment specified in the judgment. A person who has been referred for inpatient treatment may make a written request to the sentencing court asking the court to review the referral. The request for review shall be made within seven days after the agency’s referral, and shall specifically set out the grounds on which the request for review is based. The court may order a hearing on the request for review.

If the court orders probation for a defendant convicted of an offense requiring the state to collect a blood sample, oral sample, or both, from the defendant for the deoxyribonucleic acid identification registration system under AS

44.41.035

, the court shall order the defendant, as a condition of probation, to submit to the collection of

the sample or samples when requested by a health care professional acting on behalf of the state to provide the sample or samples; or

an oral sample when requested by a juvenile or adult correctional, probation, or parole officer, or a peace officer.

In addition to other conditions imposed on the defendant, while on probation and as a condition of probation

for a sex offense, as described in AS

12.63.100

, the defendant

shall be required to submit to regular periodic polygraph examinations;

may be required to provide each electronic mail address, instant messaging address, and other Internet communication identifier that the defendant uses to the defendant’s probation officer; the probation officer shall forward those addresses and identifiers to the Alaska state troopers and to the local law enforcement agency;

if the defendant was convicted of a violation of AS

11.41.434

—

11.41.455

, AS

11.61.125

—

11.61.128

, or a similar offense in another jurisdiction, the defendant may be required to refrain from

using or creating an Internet site;

communicating with children under 16 years of age;

possessing or using a computer; or

residing within 500 feet of school grounds; in this subparagraph, “school grounds” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

.

While on probation and as a special condition of probation for an offense where the aggravating factor provided in AS

12.55.155(c)(29)

has been proven or admitted, the court shall require that the defendant submit to electronic monitoring. Electronic monitoring under this subsection must provide for monitoring of the defendant’s location and movements by Global Positioning System technology. The court shall require a defendant serving a period of probation with electronic monitoring as provided under this subsection to pay all or a portion of the costs of the electronic monitoring, but only if the defendant has sufficient financial resources to pay the costs or a portion of the costs. A defendant subject to electronic monitoring under this subsection is not entitled to a credit for time served in a correctional facility while the defendant is on probation. In this subsection, “correctional facility” has the meaning given in AS

33.30.901

.

History.

(§ 8.10 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 13 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 1984; am § 13 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 1989; am §§ 3, 4 ch 188 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 95 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 44 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 14 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2007; am § 14 ch 18 SLA 2010; am § 17 ch 20 SLA 2011; am § 24 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 4 ch 17 SLA 2015; am §§
82, 83 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For the applicability provision relating to the 2015 amendment to paragraph (a)(2) of this section, see sec. 5, ch. 17, SLA 2015.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(j), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective August 26, 2003, in paragraph (a)(2) added the language beginning “, including” to the end of the paragraph.

The 2006 amendment, effective July 1, 2007, added subsection (e).

The 2007 amendment, effective September 23, 2007, added subsection (f).

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, rewrote subsection (e).

The 2011 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, in (e), added (2)(D) and made a related change.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, added (a)(7), and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment, effective August 9, 2015, in (a)(2) added “when determining the amount of actual damages or loss under this paragraph, the court shall value property as the market value of the property at the time and place of the crime or, if the market value cannot reasonably be ascertained, the cost of the replacement of the property within a reasonable time after the crime;”.

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (a), added the (a)(1) and (2) designations, and made related changes, in (a)(2)(B), substituted “subparagraph” for “paragraph”; redesignated (a)(3) — (7) as (a)(2)(C) — (G); added (a)(2)(H); in (c), substituted “(a)(2)(F)” for “(a)(6)” in the first sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 15, ch. 95, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 enactment of subsection (d) applies “to offenses committed before, on, or after September 10, 1998.”

Section 21(a), ch. 18, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 reenactment of (e) of this section applies to offenses committed on or after July 1, 2010.

The delayed repeal of (f) of this section by § 3, ch. 27, SLA 2007, which was to take effect December 31, 2012, was repealed by § 4, ch. 65, SLA 2012.

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 24, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 18, SLA 2010 (Senate Bill 222), relating to the repeal and reenactment of (e) of this section, see 2010 Senate Journal 1237 — 1239.

Sec. 12.55.101.
Additional conditions of probation for domestic violence crimes.

Before granting probation to a person convicted of a crime involving domestic violence, the court shall consider the safety and protection of the victim and any member of the victim’s family. If a person convicted of a crime involving domestic violence is placed on probation, the court may order the conditions authorized in AS

12.55.100

and AS

18.66.100(c)(1)

— (7) and (11), and may

require the defendant to participate in and complete to the satisfaction of the court one or more programs for the rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence that meet the standards set by, and that are approved by, the Department of Corrections under AS

44.28.020(b)

, if the program is available in the community where the defendant resides; the court may not order a defendant to participate in or complete a program for the rehabilitation of perpetrators of domestic violence that does not meet the standards set, and that is not approved, by the Department of Corrections under AS

44.28.020(b)

;

require the defendant to refrain from the consumption of alcohol; and

impose any other condition necessary to protect the victim and any members of the victim’s family, or to rehabilitate the defendant.

If the defendant is not in custody, the defendant shall pay the costs of an evaluation or a program of rehabilitation ordered under (a)(1) — (3) of this section. If the defendant is in custody, the responsibility for costs shall be as provided in AS

33.30.028

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 86 SLA 1998)

Sec. 12.55.102.
Alcohol-related offenses.

The court may order as a condition of probation or generally as part of a sentence that a defendant convicted of an offense involving the use, consumption, or possession of an alcoholic beverage may not operate a motor vehicle during the period of probation unless the vehicle is equipped with a properly functioning, monitored, and maintained ignition interlock device. A condition of probation or sentence imposed under this subsection takes effect after any period of license revocation imposed under AS

28.15.165(d)

or

28.15.181(c)

.

The court, in imposing probation or a condition of a sentence under (a) of this section, may allow the defendant limited privileges to drive a motor vehicle without an ignition interlock device if the court determines that the defendant is required as a condition of employment to drive a motor vehicle owned or leased by the defendant’s employer and that the defendant’s driving will not create substantial danger. If the court imposes probation described by this subsection, the court shall require the defendant to notify the defendant’s employer of the probation, and shall require that the defendant, while driving the employer’s vehicle, carry a letter from the employer authorizing the defendant to drive that vehicle.

A court imposing a condition of probation under this section shall require the surrender of the driver’s license and shall issue to the defendant a certificate valid for the duration of the probation or a copy of the defendant’s judgment of conviction. The defendant shall pay all costs associated with fulfilling the condition of probation, including installation, repair, and monitoring of an ignition interlock device.

The court may include the cost of the ignition interlock device as a part of the fine required to be imposed against the defendant under AS

28.35.030(b)

or (n) or

28.35.032(g)

or (p).

In this section,

“ignition interlock device” means equipment designed to prevent a motor vehicle from being operated by a person who has consumed an alcoholic beverage, and that has been certified by the commissioner of corrections under AS

33.05.020

.

[Repealed, § 12 ch 85 SLA 2010.]

History.

(§ 3 ch 57 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 80 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 126 SLA 2004; am § 12 ch 85 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1995, in subsection (d), “28.35.032(g) or (p)” was substituted for “28.35.032(g) or (q)” to reflect the 1995 relettering of AS

28.35.032

(q). In 2006, in (e)(2) of this section, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.100

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective January 1, 2005, in subsection (a), inserted “or generally as part of a sentence” in the first sentence and “or sentence” in the second sentence; in subsection (b), inserted “or a condition of a sentence” in the first sentence; and, in subsection (e), inserted the paragraph (1) designation and added paragraph (2).

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, repealed (e)(2).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 13, ch. 80, SLA 1995 provides that the amendment to subsection (d) made by § 2, ch. 80, SLA 1995 applies “to offenses that are committed on or after September 13, 1995, except that references to previous convictions include convictions occurring before, on, or after September 13, 1995.”

Sec. 12.55.105.
Probation fee. [Repealed, § 4 ch 26 SLA 1989.]

Sec. 12.55.110.
Notice and grounds for revocation of suspension.

When sentence has been suspended, it may not be revoked except for good cause shown. In all proceedings for the revocation of a suspended sentence, the defendant is entitled to reasonable notice and the right to be represented by counsel.

Good cause justifying the revocation of a suspended sentence is established if the defendant has violated an order of the court to participate in or comply with the treatment plan of a rehabilitation program under AS

12.55.015(a)(10)

.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

History.

(§ 8.11 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 5 ch 188 SLA 1990; am § 84 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Avoidance of Ignition Interlock Device — AS

11.76.140

Original Code Provision — AS

12.55.105

.

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(k)(4), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (c) - (h).

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (c) — (h).

Sec. 12.55.115.
Fixing eligibility for discretionary parole at sentencing.

The court may, as part of a sentence of imprisonment, further restrict the eligibility of a prisoner for discretionary parole for a term greater than that required under AS

33.16.090

and

33.16.100

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 88 SLA 1985; am § 85 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 31 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

Eligibility for discretionary parole — AS

33.16.090

Granting of discretionary parole — AS

33.16.100

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendments to this section, see sec. 185(d)(3), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For eligibility for discretionary parole, see 22 AAC 20, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, inserted “or administrative” preceding “parole” and substituted “AS

33.16.089

,

33.16.090

,” for “AS

33.16.090

”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, deleted “or administrative” following “discretionary” and substituted “AS

33.16.090

” for “AS

33.16.089

,

33.16.090

”.

Sec. 12.55.120.
Appeal of sentence.

A sentence of imprisonment lawfully imposed by the superior court for a term or for aggregate terms exceeding two years of unsuspended incarceration for a felony offense or exceeding 120 days for a misdemeanor offense may be appealed to the court of appeals by the defendant on the ground that the sentence is excessive, unless the sentence was imposed in accordance with a plea agreement under the applicable Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure and that agreement provided for imposition of a specific sentence or a sentence equal to or less than a specified maximum sentence. If the superior court imposed a sentence in accordance with a plea agreement that provided for a minimum sentence, the defendant may appeal only that portion of the sentence that exceeds the minimum sentence provided for in the plea agreement and that exceeds two years of unsuspended incarceration for a felony offense or 120 days of unsuspended incarceration for a misdemeanor offense. By appealing a sentence under this section, the defendant waives the right to plead that by a revision of the sentence resulting from the appeal the defendant has been twice placed in jeopardy for the same offense.

A sentence of imprisonment lawfully imposed by the superior court may be appealed to the court of appeals by the state on the ground that the sentence is too lenient; however, when a sentence is appealed by the state and the defendant has not appealed the sentence, the court is not authorized to increase the sentence but may express its approval or disapproval of the sentence and its reasons in a written opinion.

A sentence appeal under this section does not confer or enlarge the right to bail pending appeal. When the defendant, in the prosecution of a regular appeal, urges excessiveness of the sentence as an additional ground for appeal, the defendant’s right to bail pending appeal is governed by the relevant statutes and the rules of the court.

A sentence of imprisonment lawfully imposed by the district court for a term or for aggregate terms exceeding 120 days of unsuspended incarceration may be appealed to the superior court by the defendant on the ground that the sentence is excessive, unless the sentence was imposed in accordance with a plea agreement under the applicable Alaska Rules of Criminal Procedure and that agreement provided for imposition of a specific sentence or a sentence equal to or less than a specified maximum sentence. If the district court imposed a sentence in accordance with a plea agreement that provided for a minimum sentence, the defendant may appeal only that portion of the sentence that exceeds the minimum sentence provided for in the plea agreement and that exceeds 120 days of unsuspended incarceration. By appealing a sentence under this section, the defendant waives the right to plead that by a revision of the sentence resulting from the appeal the defendant has been twice placed in jeopardy for the same offense. A sentence of imprisonment lawfully imposed by the district court may be appealed to the superior court by the state on the ground that the sentence is too lenient; however, when a sentence is appealed by the state, the court may not increase the sentence but may express its approval or disapproval of the sentence and its reasons in a written opinion.

A sentence within an applicable presumptive range set out in AS

12.55.125

or a consecutive or partially consecutive sentence imposed in accordance with the minimum sentences set out in AS

12.55.127

may not be appealed to the court of appeals under this section or AS

22.07.020

on the ground that the sentence is excessive. However, the sentence may be reviewed by an appellate court on the ground that it is excessive through a petition filed under rules adopted by the supreme court.

The victim of the crime for which a defendant has been convicted and sentenced may file a petition for review in an appellate court of a sentence that is below the sentencing range for the crime.

History.

(§ 4 ch 117 SLA 1969; am §§ 29 — 31 ch 12 SLA 1980; am §§ 7, 8 ch 79 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 2 SLA 2005; am § 4 ch 65 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (f) was enacted as (e); relettered in 2005.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, effective March 23, 2005, added subsection (e).

The second 2005 amendment, effective July 14, 2005, added subsection (e) [now (f)].